District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1104

Repealed

Requirement for recordation of certificate of incorporation.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1276, ch. 854, § 552
Feb. 4, 1905, 33 Stat. 689, ch. 299
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(8), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1104.
1981 Ed., § 29-104.
1973 Ed., § 29-104.